California, session 20252026, AB2735.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 127632 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127632. (a) The California Reproductive Health Equity Program is hereby established within the department.(b) The purpose of the program is to ensure abortion and contraception are affordable for and accessible to for, and accessible to, all patients, regardless of their ability to pay, and to provide financial support for safety net providers of these services to offset the costs of providing uncompensated care to patients with low incomes who would otherwise lack access to care.